Indiana, session 2026, HB1432.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-36-9-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) After the state has filed the charging
instrument under IC 35-50-2-9(a) that seeks a death sentence, the
court shall appoint two (2) or three (3) competent disinterested:
(1) psychiatrists;
(2) psychologists endorsed by the state psychology board as
health service providers in psychology; or
(3) physicians;
who have expertise in diagnosing and treating intellectual
disabilities. At least one (1) person appointed under this subsection
must be a psychiatrist and at least one (1) person appointed under
this subsection must be a psychologist.
(b) The persons appointed under subsection (a) shall examine
the defendant and each shall prepare a separate written evaluation
for the purpose of providing evidence of the following:
(1) Whether the defendant has a significantly subaverage level
HB 1432—LS 7043/DI 106


of intellectual functioning.
(2) Whether the defendant's adaptive behavior is substantially
impaired.
(3) Whether the conditions described in subdivisions (1) and
(2) existed before the defendant became twenty-two (22) years
of age.
(c) After all written evaluations have been completed, each
person appointed under subsection (a) shall:
(1) transmit a copy their evaluation to the defendant; and
(2) notify the court that they have transmitted a copy of their
evaluation to the defendant.
SECTION 2. IC 35-36-9-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2015,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The defendant may file a petition alleging
that the defendant is an individual with an intellectual disability not
later than thirty (30) days after receipt of all evaluations described
in section 2.5 of this chapter.
(b) The petition must be filed not later than twenty (20) days before
the omnibus date.
(c) Whenever the defendant files a petition under this section, the
court shall order an evaluation of the defendant for the purpose of
providing evidence of the following:
(1) Whether the defendant has a significantly subaverage level of
intellectual functioning.
(2) Whether the defendant's adaptive behavior is substantially
impaired.
(3) Whether the conditions described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
existed before the defendant became twenty-two (22) years of age.
(b) If the defendant elects not to file a petition alleging that the
defendant is an individual with a disability, the intellectual
disability evaluations and any other evidence produced as a result
of the examination of the defendant are privileged and inadmissible
at trial by either party for any purpose.
(c) If the defendant files a petition alleging that the defendant is
an individual with a disability the court shall:
(1) order the persons who conducted the examinations of the
defendant under section 2.5 of this chapter to transmit a copy
of their evaluations to the court and to the appropriate
prosecuting attorney; and
(2) set the matter for hearing.
SECTION 3. IC 35-36-9-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2015,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HB 1432—LS 7043/DI 106


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The court shall conduct a The persons who
examined the defendant under section 2.5 of this chapter shall
testify at the hearing on the a petition filed under this chapter
(b) At the hearing, the defendant must prove by clear and
convincing evidence that the defendant is an individual with an
intellectual disability.
SECTION 4. IC 35-36-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2015,
SECTION 51, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Not later than ten (10) days before the initial
trial date, The court shall determine before trial whether the defendant
is an individual with an intellectual disability based on the evidence set
forth at the hearing under section 4 of this chapter. The court shall
articulate findings supporting the court's determination under this
section.
HB 1432—LS 7043/DI 106


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1432, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1432 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 13, nays 0.
HB 1432—LS 7043/DI 106